California, session 20252026, AB51.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 3.15 (commencing with Section 41475) is added to Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: CHAPTER 3.15. General Fund Cashflow Loan Repayment for Inglewood Unified School District41475. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, once the Inglewood Unified School District has successfully repaid at least 10 years of a General Fund cashflow loan made pursuant to Section 83 of Chapter 48 of the Statutes of 2013, as amended by Section 57 of Chapter 357 of the Statutes of 2013, the school district may seek, and the Department of Finance shall grant, a waiver of interest on that loan for the next succeeding fiscal year if both of the following conditions are met:(1) In conjunction with the filing of the school district’s second interim financial report pursuant to Section 42130, the Inglewood Unified School District notifies the Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools and the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team of their intent to seek a waiver of interest for the next succeeding fiscal year. A copy of the notification shall also be sent, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Assembly Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Education, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance.(2) The Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools, in consultation with the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, determines that the school district is making substantial progress towards fiscal solvency and a waiver of interest would help the school district to exit receivership, based on the successful completion of all of the following:(A) Meeting the requirements for qualified or positive certification for the school district’s second interim report pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42130) of Chapter 6.(B) Completing comprehensive operational reviews that compare the needs of the school district with similar school districts and provide data and recommendations regarding changes the school district can make to achieve fiscal sustainability.(C) Undergoing an annual independent audit pursuant to Section 41020 and submitting a fiscal recovery plan to the Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools detailing the steps taken to address any material weaknesses or internal control deficiencies.(b) For each subsequent fiscal year after the initial waiver of interest, the Inglewood Unified School District may seek, and the Department of Finance shall grant, a subsequent waiver of interest for the applicable fiscal year if the school district again meets the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) for each waiver.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances relating to the fiscal emergency in the Inglewood Unified School District.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 83 of Chapter 48 of the Statutes of 2013, as amended by Section 57 of Chapter 357 of the Statutes of 2013, is amended to read:Sec. 83.(a)Notwithstanding any other law, the Inglewood Unified School District, through the State Department of Education, may request cashflow loans from the General Fund for a total of up to fifty-five million dollars ($55,000,000) for emergency operational purposes.(b)Unless otherwise specified in this section, the terms and conditions of any General Fund cashflow loan provided pursuant to this section shall be subject to approval by the Director of Finance and shall be consistent with the terms and conditions of the General Fund emergency apportionment issued pursuant to Chapter 325 of the Statutes of 2012. The terms and conditions of the General Fund cashflow loan shall include authorization for the payment of costs incurred before June 15, 2013, by the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank to implement Section 10 of Chapter 325 of the Statutes of 2012. Notwithstanding the interest rates specified in the terms and conditions of the General Fund loan issued pursuant to Chapter 325 of the Statutes of 2012, the interest on these loans shall be charged at the annual rate of return of the Pooled Money Investment Account, plus an additional 2 percent until December 31, 2025, and commencing January 1, 2026, the interest rate shall be 0 percent.(c)Once a General Fund cashflow loan is approved pursuant to this section, and upon the order of the Director of Finance, the Controller shall draw warrants against General Fund cash to the Inglewood Unified School District to provide a cashflow loan.(d)Upon approval of a General Fund cashflow loan pursuant to this section, a repayment schedule shall be determined by the Department of Finance. If a required payment is not made within 60 days after a scheduled date, upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall pay the defaulted General Fund cashflow loan repayment by withholding that amount from the next available payment that would otherwise be made to the county treasurer on behalf of the school district pursuant to Section 14041 of the Education Code.(e)The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 15 days of authorizing a General Fund cashflow loan pursuant to this section.(f)A cashflow loan from the General Fund authorized by this section does not constitute budgetary expenditures. A cashflow loan, and the repayment of a cashflow loan, made under this section shall not affect the General Fund reserve.(g)Issuance of a General Fund cashflow loan authorized pursuant to this section shall require the Inglewood Unified School District to abide by all provisions associated with the issuance of the emergency loan specified in Chapter 325 of the Statutes of 2012, including those cited in Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) and Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 41325) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code.(h)As a condition of requesting a General Fund cashflow loan pursuant to this section, the Inglewood Unified School District shall repay the twenty-nine million dollar ($29,000,000) General Fund loan issued pursuant to Chapter 325 of the Statutes of 2012 from the proceeds of the school district’s initial request for a General Fund cashflow loan.